incubator/apertium-sjo/dev/transliterate/lat-sjo.twol
Alphabet 

 ᠠ ᠪ ᠨ ᡣ ᡬ ᡭ ᠸ ᡫ ᠶ ᡪ ᠯ ᠮ ᡠ ᡡ ᠣ ᡝ ᡞ ᡟ ᡠ ᡡ ᡢ ᡣ ᡤ ᡥ ᡦ ᡧ ᡨ ᡩ ᡪ ᡫ ᡬ ᡭ ᡮ ᡯ ᡰ ᠴ ᡱ ᡲ ᡳ ᡴ ᡵ ᡶ ᡷ
 
 a:ᠠ
 b:ᠪ
 c:ᠴ
 d:ᡩ
 e:ᡝ
 f:ᡫ
 g:ᡤ
 h:ᡥ
 i:ᡞ
 j:ᡪ
 k:ᡣ
 l:ᠯ
 m:ᠮ
 n:ᠨ
! ng:ᡢ  ! probably undefined behaviour?  let's do this with some rules
 o:ᠣ
 p:ᡦ
 r:ᡵ
 s:ᠰ
 š:ᡧ
 t:ᡨ
 u:ᡠ
 û:ᡡ
 w:ᠸ
 x:ᡭ
 y:ᠶ


 ;


Sets 

BackVow = a o û ;


Rules 

"uvularise the velars" 
Vx:Vy <=> _ BackVow: ;
      where
          Vx in ( ᡤ ᡥ ᡣ )
          Vy in ( ᡬ ᡭ ᡣ )
      matched ;

"n of ng sequence"
n:ᡢ <=> _ g: ;

"g of ng sequence"
g:0 <=> n:ᡢ _ ;
